North Carolina, session 2025, HB589.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. This act shall be known as "The Second Look Act."
SECTION 2. Article 83 of Chapter 15A of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 15A-1357. Modification of an imposed term of imprisonment.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an individual serving a term of
imprisonment pursuant to G.S. 20-179 or Article 81B or 82 of this Chapter, except those
sentenced to life imprisonment, may file a motion for appropriate relief in accordance with
Article 89 of this Chapter for a modification of the person's sentence pursuant to the authority
granted in this section.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the court shall reduce a term of
imprisonment imposed upon a defendant for an offense if:
(1) The defendant was sentenced pursuant to G.S. 20-179 or Article 81B or 82 of
this Chapter and has served at least (i) 10 years in prison or (ii) fifty percent
(50%) of the sentence imposed if the sentence was for 10 years or less.
(2) The court finds, after considering the factors set forth in subsection (c) of this
section, that the defendant is not a danger to the safety of any person or the
community and that the interests of justice warrant a sentence modification.
*H589-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) The court, in determining whether to reduce a term of imprisonment pursuant to
subsection (b) of this section, shall consider any of the following:
(1) The defendant's age at the time of the offense.
(2) The history and characteristics of the defendant.
(3) Whether the defendant has substantially complied with the rules of the
institution to which he or she has been confined and whether the defendant
has completed any educational, vocational, or other program, where available.
(4) Whether the defendant has completed any behavioral health treatment or
stabilization.
(5) Any report or recommendation received from the district attorney in the
prosecutorial district in which the conviction was entered.
(6) Whether the defendant has demonstrated maturity, rehabilitation, and a fitness
to reenter society sufficient to justify a sentence reduction.
(7) Any statement provided orally or in writing pursuant to G.S. 15A-832.1(c) by
a victim of the offense for which the defendant is imprisoned or by a family
member of the victim if the victim is deceased.
(8) Any reports of physical, mental, or psychiatric examinations of the defendant
conducted by licensed health care professionals.
(9) The defendant's family and community circumstances at the time of the
offense, including any history of abuse, trauma, or involvement in the child
welfare system.
(10) The extent of the defendant's role in the offense and whether, and to what
extent, an adult was involved in the offense.
(11) The diminished culpability of juveniles as compared to that of adults, and the
hallmark features of youth, including immaturity, impetuosity, and failure to
appreciate risks and consequences, which counsel against sentencing them to
lengthy terms in prison, despite the brutality or cold-blooded nature of any
particular crime.
(12) Any other information the court deems relevant to its decision.
(d) A motion for appropriate relief filed pursuant to this section shall not be granted or
denied without a hearing held in accordance with Article 89 of this Chapter.
(e) Any defendant whose sentence is reduced under this section shall be resentenced
pursuant to G.S. 20-179 or Article 81B or 82 of this Chapter, as applicable."
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to motions
for appropriate relief filed on or after that date.
Page 2 House Bill 589-First Edition